Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1201
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-1201 to 71-1226.01 shall be known and may be cited as the Sex Offender Commitment Act.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 57;

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 24.